Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-495
License; available for presentation.

It shall be the duty of every person who has been issued a license under sections 37-484 to 37-496 to have evidence of the same in his or her possession for immediate presentation to the conservation officers and employees of the commission or any other peace officer making demand for same.

Laws 1957, c. 152, § 13, p. 496;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 39;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-913;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 205;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 64;

Laws 2003, LB 305, § 17.